Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-7] State warning point. (a)
The agency shall establish and operate a communications and warning center that
shall be known as the state warning point. The state warning point shall be
continually staffed by the agency to monitor warning systems and devices and
shall have the ability to provide timely warning and notification to government
officials, county warning points and emergency operations centers and, when
directed, the general public.

(b) Each county shall establish and operate a
communications and warning center that shall be known as a county warning
point. The county warning points shall be continually staffed by the
respective counties and shall be capable of communicating with the state
warning point at all times. The county warning points shall provide timely
warning and notification to government officials and the public, when directed.
[L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next